Florida, session 2026, SB1568.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.âSection 17.72, Florida Statutes, is created to 37 read: 38 17.72âFlorida Stablecoin Pilot Program.âThere is 39 established within the department the Florida Stablecoin Pilot 40 Program. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Florida 41 Stablecoin Pilot Program yield benefits from the acceptance of 42 payment stablecoins as a form of payment for governmental fees 43 through this voluntary pilot program. 44 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 45 (a)ââBlockchainâ means a mathematically secured, 46 chronological, decentralized, distributed, and digital ledger or 47 database that consists of records of transactions that cannot be 48 altered retroactively. 49 (b)ââCompatible digital wallet addressâ means the address 50 of a software application that securely stores private keys for 51 accessing and completing transactions with payment stablecoins. 52 (c)ââDigital assetâ means any digital representation of 53 value that is recorded on a cryptographically secured digital 54 ledger. 55 (d)ââExchange platformâ means a company licensed and 56 regulated by the Federal Government or a state government which 57 provides trading, custody, or money transmission services of 58 payment stablecoins or other digital assets. 59 (e)ââExchange platform feeâ means a fee charged by an 60 exchange platform for the trading, custody, or money 61 transmission services of payment stablecoins or other digital 62 assets. 63 (f)ââFederal qualified payment stablecoin issuerâ means any 64 of the following: 65 1.âA nonbank entity, other than a state qualified payment 66 stablecoin issuer, approved by the Office of the Comptroller of 67 the Currency to issue payment stablecoins. 68 2.âAn uninsured national bank that is chartered by the 69 Office of the Comptroller of the Currency pursuant to title LXII 70 of the Revised Statutes and is approved to issue payment 71 stablecoins. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term 72 ânational bankâ has the same meaning as in the GENIUS Act, Pub. 73 L. No. 119-27. 74 3.âA federal branch that is approved by the Office of the 75 Comptroller of the Currency to issue payment stablecoins. For 76 purposes of this subparagraph, the term âfederal branchâ has the 77 same meaning as in s. 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 78 U.S.C. s. 1813. 79 (g)ââNetwork feeâ means the cost paid by a user to have a 80 transaction processed and confirmed on a blockchain network. 81 (h)1.ââPayment stablecoinâ means a digital asset that meets 82 all of the following requirements: 83 a.âIs, or is designed to be, used as a means of payment or 84 settlement. 85 b.âThe issuer of which: 86 (I)âIs obligated to convert, redeem, or repurchase the 87 digital asset for a fixed amount of monetary value, not 88 including a digital asset denominated in a fixed amount of 89 monetary value. 90 (II)âRepresents that such issuer will maintain, or create 91 the reasonable expectation that it will maintain, a stable value 92 relative to the value of a fixed amount of monetary value. 93 2.âThe term does not include a digital asset that is any of 94 the following: 95 a.âA national currency as defined in the GENIUS Act, Pub. 96 L. No. 119-27. 97 b.âA deposit as defined in s. 3 of the Federal Deposit 98 Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. s. 1813, including a deposit recorded 99 using distributed ledger technology. For purposes of this sub 100 subparagraph, the term âdistributed ledgerâ has the same meaning 101 as in the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27. 102 c.âA security as defined in s. 517.021, s. 2 of the 103 Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. s. 77b, s. 3 of the Securities 104 and Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. s. 78c, or s. 2 of the 105 Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. s. 80a-2. 106 (i)ââPermitted payment stablecoin issuerâ means a person 107 formed in the United States which is one of the following: 108 1.âA subsidiary of an insured depository institution that 109 has been approved to issue payment stablecoins under the GENIUS 110 Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27. For purposes of this subparagraph, the 111 term âinsured depository institutionâ has the same meaning as in 112 the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27. 113 2.âA federal qualified payment stablecoin issuer. 114 3.âA state qualified payment stablecoin issuer. 115 (j)ââState payment stablecoin regulatorâ means the Office 116 of Financial Regulation. The term also includes a state agency 117 in another state that has primary regulatory and supervisory 118 authority in such state over entities that issue payment 119 stablecoins. 120 (k)ââState qualified payment stablecoin issuerâ means an 121 entity legally established under the laws of a state and 122 approved to issue payment stablecoins by a state payment 123 stablecoin regulator. 124 (2)âPROGRAM PARTICIPATION.â 125 (a)âThe department may engage in any of the following 126 activities that meet the requirements of this section: 127 1.âAccept payment stablecoin for the payment of authorized 128 fees as provided in paragraph (c). 129 2.âIssue refunds, reimbursements, or other similar 130 disbursements in the form of payment stablecoins to any 131 participant who elects to receive a payment in such form. The 132 department may purchase payment stablecoins in an amount that is 133 necessary to support such activity. 134 3.âHold payment stablecoin. If such payment stablecoin does 135 not earn any interest or yields, the department may hold payment 136 stablecoin only in the amount that is estimated to be required 137 to issue refunds, reimbursements, or other similar disbursements 138 during a revolving 30-day period. Any direct or indirect yields 139 earned with respect to payment stablecoins shall be credited to 140 the benefit of the state. 141 (b)âThe department may designate one or more payment 142 stablecoins for activities authorized in paragraph (a). Any 143 payment stablecoin that is accepted, purchased, held, or 144 disbursed by the department pursuant to this section must meet 145 all of the following criteria: 146 1.âHave an average market capitalization of at least $1 147 billion during the preceding 12-month period. 148 2.âBe fully backed by reserve assets on a one-to-one basis 149 limited to United States currency, demand deposits at insured 150 depository institutions, United States Treasury bills having a 151 remaining maturity of 93 days or less, or reverse repurchase 152 agreements collateralized by such treasury bills. 153 3.âBe redeemable at all times at a one-to-one ratio for 154 United States dollars through the permitted payment stablecoin 155 issuer or its agent. 156 4.âBe issued by a permitted payment stablecoin issuer. 157 5.âBe purchased by the department directly from a permitted 158 payment stablecoin issuer through a blockchain network or 159 indirectly through an exchange platform, or received by the 160 department from a program participant. 161 6.âBe subject, if network fees or exchange platform fees 162 are paid by the department, only to reasonable fees that do not 163 exceed the fees that would be charged to the department if 164 payment were accepted by similar mediums of exchange. 165 7.âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, be issued 166 by an issuer that meets any additional criteria for a permitted 167 payment stablecoin issuer under any applicable federal or state 168 law including, but not limited to, the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 169 119-27. 170 (c)âThe department may accept payment stablecoins as a form 171 of payment for fees that include, but are not limited to, 172 licensing fees, registration fees, certification fees, 173 assessment fees, application fees, renewal fees, other 174 regulatory fees administered by the department, or any other fee 175 owed to the department. 176 (d)âAn applicant, a licensee, or other program participant 177 may elect to voluntarily participate in the pilot program and 178 remit payment stablecoins to a compatible digital wallet address 179 designated by the department as a valid form of payment for any 180 fee authorized in paragraph (c). 181 (e)âA participant that elects to receive from the 182 department a refund, reimbursement, or other similar 183 disbursement in the form of payment stablecoin must provide the 184 department with a compatible digital wallet address where such 185 payment may be sent. 186 (3)âDEPARTMENT DUTIES.â 187 (a)âThe department must comply with all of the following 188 requirements: 189 1.âEnsure that any payment stablecoin issuer designated for 190 use in the pilot program is a permitted payment stablecoin 191 issuer. If the Federal Government has not approved any federal 192 qualified payment stablecoin issuers and no state payment 193 stablecoin regulator has approved any state qualified payment 194 stablecoin issuers, the department may not engage in any of the 195 activities authorized in subsection (2). 196 2.âProvide a compatible digital wallet address to any 197 participant that elects to participate in the voluntary pilot 198 program for the payment of any fees authorized in paragraph 199 (2)(c) to be paid in the form of payment stablecoins. 200 3.âWithin a reasonable time after receiving a payment 201 stablecoin from any program participant, convert the payment 202 stablecoin into United States currency and credit the applicable 203 account where the funds would be held in a qualified public 204 depository, unless an exception applies pursuant to s. 280.03, 205 in the same manner as a payment made by any other authorized 206 means. The department must attempt to minimize the amount of 207 potential fees, if applicable, when determining the date and 208 time to convert the payment stablecoin. 209 (b)âThe department may conduct examinations, audits, or 210 investigations of a permitted payment stablecoin issuer of a 211 payment stablecoin designated for use in the pilot program to 212 verify asset backing, redeemability, and adherence to consumer 213 protection standards, including standards related to fraud 214 prevention and dispute resolution. To the extent that the 215 department intends to engage in such conduct as to a state 216 qualified payment stablecoin issuer, the department must 217 coordinate with the Office of Financial Regulation to avoid 218 duplicated efforts and to efficiently regulate such issuer. 219 (4)âREPORTING.â 220 (a)âThe department shall monitor and evaluate the pilot 221 program and collect data on transaction volume, cost savings, 222 security incidents, regulatory compliance, and economic impacts, 223 as well as any instances of fraud or disputes. 224 (b)âBeginning February 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, 225 the department must submit a report to the Governor, the 226 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 227 Representatives which must include all of the following: 228 1.âA summary of the data collected pursuant to paragraph 229 (a). 230 2.âAny findings the department makes with respect to the 231 pilot program which include, but are not limited to, findings 232 regarding any trends or patterns relating to financial matters, 233 such as fiscal impacts, or nonfinancial matters, such as 234 utilization analysis. 235 3.âAny recommendations for expansion or termination of the 236 pilot program. 237 4.âAny proposed statutory changes, if appropriate. 238 (5)âCONSTRUCTION.âThis section: 239 (a)âDoes not alter or supersede any existing statutory fee 240 obligations, licensing requirements, or enforcement authority of 241 the department. 242 (b)âAuthorizes the acceptance of payment stablecoins as an 243 optional payment method and does not require or authorize the 244 acceptance of any other digital asset. 245 (c)âMay not be construed to relieve the Chief Financial 246 Officer or the department of any obligation to secure public 247 funds, including any payment stablecoins, in a qualified public 248 depository unless an exemption applies pursuant to s. 280.03 or, 249 with respect to payment stablecoins, to hold such stablecoins in 250 a manner similar to how direct United States Treasury 251 obligations are held pursuant to s. 17.57(2)(a). 252 (d)âAuthorizes the department to give preference to, when 253 designating payment stablecoins for use in the pilot program 254 pursuant to paragraph (2)(b), state qualified payment stablecoin 255 issuers approved by the Office of Financial Regulation. 256 (6)âRULEMAKING.âThe department may adopt rules to implement 257 this section. 258 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.